Illinois, session 104th, SB2337.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 5-4.5-115 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/5-4.5-115)7    Sec. 5-4.5-115. Parole review of persons under the age of 821 at the time of the commission of an offense.9    (a) For purposes of this Section, "victim" means a victim 10of a violent crime as defined in subsection (a) of Section 3 of 11the Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act including a 12witness as defined in subsection (b) of Section 3 of the Rights 13of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act; any person legally related 14to the victim by blood, marriage, adoption, or guardianship; 15any friend of the victim; or any concerned citizen.16    (b) A person under 21 years of age at the time of the 17commission of an offense or offenses, other than first degree 18murder, and who is not serving a sentence for first degree 19murder and who is sentenced on or after June 1, 2019 (the 20effective date of Public Act 100-1182) shall be eligible for 21parole review by the Prisoner Review Board after serving 10 22years or more of his or her sentence or sentences, except for 23those serving a sentence or sentences for: (1) aggravated   SB2337- 2 -LRB104 11321 RLC 21408 b1criminal sexual assault who shall be eligible for parole 2review by the Prisoner Review Board after serving 20 years or 3more of his or her sentence or sentences or (2) predatory 4criminal sexual assault of a child who shall not be eligible 5for parole review by the Prisoner Review Board under this 6Section. A person under 21 years of age at the time of the 7commission of first degree murder who is sentenced on or after 8June 1, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 100-1182) shall 9be eligible for parole review by the Prisoner Review Board 10after serving 20 years or more of his or her sentence or 11sentences, except for those subject to a term of natural life 12imprisonment under Section 5-8-1 of this Code or any person 13subject to sentencing under subsection (f) (c) of Section 145-4.5-105 of this Code, who shall be eligible for parole 15review by the Prisoner Review Board after serving 40 years or 16more of his or her sentence or sentences.17    (c) Any date after serving the minimum term of years to 18become eligible for parole review as set forth in subsection 19(b), or up to 3 Three years prior to becoming eligible for 20parole review, the eligible person may file his or her 21petition for parole review with the Prisoner Review Board. The 22petition shall include a copy of the order of commitment and 23sentence to the Department of Corrections for the offense or 24offenses for which review is sought. Within 30 days of receipt 25of this petition, the Prisoner Review Board shall determine 26whether the petition is appropriately filed, and if so, shall   SB2337- 3 -LRB104 11321 RLC 21408 b1set a date for parole review 3 years from receipt of the 2petition or the date the person is eligible for parole review, 3whichever date is sooner, and notify the Department of 4Corrections within 10 business days. However in no such 5circumstance shall the hearing be scheduled sooner than one 6year from the date of the determination that the petition is 7appropriately filed. If the Prisoner Review Board determines 8that the petition is not appropriately filed, it shall notify 9the petitioner in writing, including a basis for its 10determination.11    (d) Within 6 months of the Prisoner Review Board's 12determination that the petition was appropriately filed, a 13representative from the Department of Corrections shall meet 14with the eligible person and provide the inmate information 15about the parole hearing process and personalized 16recommendations for the inmate regarding his or her work 17assignments, rehabilitative programs, and institutional 18behavior. Following this meeting, the eligible person has 7 19calendar days to file a written request to the representative 20from the Department of Corrections who met with the eligible 21person of any additional programs and services which the 22eligible person believes should be made available to prepare 23the eligible person for return to the community. 24    (e) One year prior to the person being eligible for 25parole, counsel shall be appointed by the Prisoner Review 26Board upon a finding of indigency. The eligible person may   SB2337- 4 -LRB104 11321 RLC 21408 b1waive appointed counsel or retain his or her own counsel at his 2or her own expense.3    (f) Nine months prior to the hearing, the Prisoner Review 4Board shall provide the eligible person, and his or her 5counsel, any written documents or materials it will be 6considering in making its decision unless the written 7documents or materials are specifically found to: (1) include 8information which, if disclosed, would damage the therapeutic 9relationship between the inmate and a mental health 10professional; (2) subject any person to the actual risk of 11physical harm; (3) threaten the safety or security of the 12Department or an institution. In accordance with Section 134.5(d)(4) of the Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act and 14Section 10 of the Open Parole Hearings Act, victim statements 15provided to the Board shall be confidential and privileged, 16including any statements received prior to the effective date 17of this amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly, except 18if the statement was an oral statement made by the victim at a 19hearing open to the public. Victim statements shall not be 20considered public documents under the provisions of the 21Freedom of Information Act. The inmate or his or her attorney 22shall not be given a copy of the statement, but shall be 23informed of the existence of a victim statement and the 24position taken by the victim on the inmate's request for 25parole. This shall not be construed to permit disclosure to an 26inmate of any information which might result in the risk of   SB2337- 5 -LRB104 11321 RLC 21408 b1threats or physical harm to a victim. The Prisoner Review 2Board shall have an ongoing duty to provide the eligible 3person, and his or her counsel, with any further documents or 4materials that come into its possession prior to the hearing 5subject to the limitations contained in this subsection.6    (g) Not less than 12 months prior to the hearing, the 7Prisoner Review Board shall provide notification to the 8State's Attorney of the county from which the person was 9committed and written notification to the victim or family of 10the victim of the scheduled hearing place, date, and 11approximate time. The written notification shall contain: (1) 12information about their right to be present, appear in person 13at the parole hearing, and their right to make an oral 14statement and submit information in writing, by videotape, 15tape recording, or other electronic means; (2) a toll-free 16number to call for further information about the parole review 17process; and (3) information regarding available resources, 18including trauma-informed therapy, they may access. If the 19Board does not have knowledge of the current address of the 20victim or family of the victim, it shall notify the State's 21Attorney of the county of commitment and request assistance in 22locating the victim or family of the victim. Those victims or 23family of the victims who advise the Board in writing that they 24no longer wish to be notified shall not receive future 25notices. A victim shall have the right to submit information 26by videotape, tape recording, or other electronic means. The   SB2337- 6 -LRB104 11321 RLC 21408 b1victim may submit this material prior to or at the parole 2hearing. The victim also has the right to be heard at the 3parole hearing.4    (h) The hearing conducted by the Prisoner Review Board 5shall be governed by Sections 15 and 20, subsection (f) of 6Section 5, subsections (a), (a-5), (b), (b-5), and (c) of 7Section 10, and subsection (d) of Section 25 of the Open Parole 8Hearings Act and Part 1610 of Title 20 of the Illinois 9Administrative Code. The eligible person has a right to be 10present at the Prisoner Review Board hearing, unless the 11Prisoner Review Board determines the eligible person's 12presence is unduly burdensome when conducting a hearing under 13paragraph (6.6) of subsection (a) of Section 3-3-2 of this 14Code. If a psychological evaluation is submitted for the 15Prisoner Review Board's consideration, it shall be prepared by 16a person who has expertise in adolescent brain development and 17behavior, and shall take into consideration the diminished 18culpability of youthful offenders, the hallmark features of 19youth, and any subsequent growth and increased maturity of the 20person. At the hearing, the eligible person shall have the 21right to make a statement on his or her own behalf.22    (i) Only upon motion for good cause shall the date for the 23Prisoner Review Board hearing, as set by subsection (b) of 24this Section, be changed. No less than 15 days prior to the 25hearing, the Prisoner Review Board shall notify the victim or 26victim representative, the attorney, and the eligible person   SB2337- 7 -LRB104 11321 RLC 21408 b1of the exact date and time of the hearing. All hearings shall 2be open to the public.3    (j) The Prisoner Review Board shall not parole the 4eligible person if it determines that:5        (1) there is a substantial risk that the eligible 6    person will not conform to reasonable conditions of parole 7    or aftercare release; or8        (2) the eligible person's release at that time would 9    deprecate the seriousness of his or her offense or promote 10    disrespect for the law; or11        (3) the eligible person's release would have a 12    substantially adverse effect on institutional discipline.13    In considering the factors affecting the release 14determination under 20 Ill. Adm. Code 1610.50(b), the Prisoner 15Review Board panel shall consider the diminished culpability 16of youthful offenders, the hallmark features of youth, and any 17subsequent growth and maturity of the youthful offender during 18incarceration. 19    (k) Unless denied parole under subsection (j) of this 20Section and subject to the provisions of Section 3-3-9 of this 21Code: (1) the eligible person serving a sentence for any 22non-first degree murder offense or offenses, shall be released 23on parole which shall operate to discharge any remaining term 24of years sentence imposed upon him or her, notwithstanding any 25required mandatory supervised release period the eligible 26person is required to serve; and (2) the eligible person   SB2337- 8 -LRB104 11321 RLC 21408 b1serving a sentence for any first degree murder offense, shall 2be released on mandatory supervised release for a period of 10 3years subject to Section 3-3-8, which shall operate to 4discharge any remaining term of years sentence imposed upon 5him or her, however in no event shall the eligible person serve 6a period of mandatory supervised release greater than the 7aggregate of the discharged underlying sentence and the 8mandatory supervised release period as sent forth in Section 95-4.5-20.10    (l) If the Prisoner Review Board denies parole after 11conducting the hearing under subsection (j) of this Section, 12it shall issue a written decision which states the rationale 13for denial, including the primary factors considered. This 14decision shall be provided to the eligible person and his or 15her counsel within 30 days.16    (m) A person denied parole under subsection (j) of this 17Section, who is not serving a sentence for either first degree 18murder or aggravated criminal sexual assault, shall be 19eligible for a second parole review by the Prisoner Review 20Board 5 years after the written decision under subsection (l) 21of this Section; a person denied parole under subsection (j) 22of this Section, who is serving a sentence or sentences for 23first degree murder or aggravated criminal sexual assault 24shall be eligible for a second and final parole review by the 25Prisoner Review Board 10 years after the written decision 26under subsection (k) of this Section. The procedures for a   SB2337- 9 -LRB104 11321 RLC 21408 b1second parole review shall be governed by subsections (c) 2through (k) of this Section.3    (n) A person denied parole under subsection (m) of this 4Section, who is not serving a sentence for either first degree 5murder or aggravated criminal sexual assault, shall be 6eligible for a third and final parole review by the Prisoner 7Review Board 5 years after the written decision under 8subsection (l) of this Section. The procedures for the third 9and final parole review shall be governed by subsections (c) 10through (k) of this Section. 11    (o) Notwithstanding anything else to the contrary in this 12Section, nothing in this Section shall be construed to delay 13parole or mandatory supervised release consideration for 14petitioners who are or will be eligible for release earlier 15than this Section provides. Nothing in this Section shall be 16construed as a limit, substitution, or bar on a person's right 17to sentencing relief, or any other manner of relief, obtained 18by order of a court in proceedings other than as provided in 19this Section.20(Source: P.A. 101-288, eff. 1-1-20; 102-1128, eff. 1-1-24.)